ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 피겨 스케이팅/하키 > 하키 보호 장비: 하키 컴프레션 팬츠; 하키 팔꿈치 보호대; 하키 거들; 하키 글러브; 하키 골키퍼 장비 세트; 하키 헬멧; 하키 낭심 및 골반 보호대; 하키 목 보호대; 하키 팬츠; 하키 정강이 보호대/다리 보호대; 하키 어깨 보호대/가슴 보호대; 하키 멜빵/벨트; 정강이 보호대 스트랩 및 액세서리
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Trượt băng nghệ thuật và khúc côn cầu > Đồ bảo vệ môn khúc côn cầu: Quần bó cơ khúc côn cầu; Đệm khuỷu tay khúc côn cầu; Quần lót bảo hộ khúc côn cầu; Găng tay chơi khúc côn cầu; Bộ dụng cụ khung thành khúc côn cầu; Mũ bảo hiểm chơi khúc côn cầu; Đồ bảo hộ hạ bộ và xương chậu khúc côn cầu; Đệm bảo vệ cổ khúc côn cầu; Quần chơi khúc côn cầu; Đệm chân và bảo vệ cẳng chân khúc côn cầu; Bảo vệ ngực và đệm vai khúc côn cầu; Móc treo & thắt lưng khúc côn cầu; Phụ kiện và dây đeo ốp bảo vệ ống đồng
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Patinação artística e hóquei > Equipamento de proteção de hóquei: Calças de compressão de hóquei; Cotoveleiras de hóquei; Cintas protetoras de hóquei; Luvas de hóquei; Conjuntos de equipamento para goleiro de hóquei; Capacetes de hóquei; Coquilhas e protetores pélvicos de hóquei; Protetores de pescoço de hóquei; Calças de hóquei; Caneleiras e joelheiras de hóquei; Protetores de ombros e peito para hóquei; Suspensórios e cintos de hóquei; Tiras e acessórios para caneleiras
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Műkorcsolya és jégkorong > Jégkorong-védőfelszerelés: Jégkorong kompressziós nadrágok; Jégkorong-könyökpárnák; Jégkorong alsó védőnadrágok; Jégkorongkesztyűk; Jégkorongkapusfelszerelés-készletek; Jégkorongsisakok; Jégkorong szuszpenzorok és medencevédők; Jégkorong nyakvédők; Jégkorongnadrágok; Jégkorong-lábszárvédők és -lábpárnák; Jégkorong-vállpárnák és -mellkasvédők; Jégkorong-nadrágtartók és -övek; Sípcsontvédő-pántok és -kiegészítők
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Hóquei e patinagem artística > Equipamento de proteção para hóquei: Calças de compressão de hóquei; Cotoveleiras para hóquei; Cintas de hóquei; Luvas para hóquei; Conjuntos de equipamento de guarda-redes para hóquei; Capacetes para hóquei; Suportes atléticos e proteções pélvicas de hóquei; Proteções de pescoço de hóquei; Calças para hóquei; Proteções de pernas e caneleiras para hóquei; Protetores de peito e de ombros para hóquei; Cintos e suspensórios para hóquei; Fitas e acessórios para caneleiras
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Dailusis čiuožimas ir ledo ritulys > Ledo ritulio apsauginės priemonės: Ledo ritulio kompresinės kelnės; Ledo ritulio alkūnių pagalvėlės; Ledo ritulio diržai; Ledo ritulio pirštinės; Ledo ritulio vartininko įrangos komplektai; Ledo ritulio šalmai; Ledo ritulio apsauginės kelnaitės ir dubens apsaugos; Ledo ritulio kaklo apsaugos; Ledo ritulio kelnės; Ledo ritulio blauzdų apsaugos ir kojų pagalvėlės; Ledo ritulio pečių pagalvėlės ir krūtinės apsaugos; Ledo ritulio petnešos ir diržai; Blauzdų apsaugų dirželiai ir priedai
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 花样滑冰与冰球 > 冰球护具: 冰球紧身裤; 冰球护肘垫; 冰球防撞束裤; 冰球/曲棍球手套; 冰球/曲棍球守门员设备套装; 冰球/曲棍球头盔; 冰球护裆与骨盆护具; 冰球护颈; 冰球裤; 冰球护胫/护腿垫; 冰球肩膀衬垫/护胸; 冰球/曲棍球背带/腰带; 护胫绑带和配件
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Patinaj artistic și hochei > Echipamente de protecție pentru hochei: Pantaloni compresivi pentru hochei; Cotiere pentru hochei; Centuri de protecție pentru hochei; Mănuși pentru hochei; Seturi de echipamente pentru portar hochei; Căști pentru hochei; Protecții pelviene și suspensoare pentru hochei; Protecții de gât pentru hochei; Pantaloni pentru hochei; Protecții pentru tibie și paduri pentru picioare pentru hochei; Apărătoare pentru umeri și protecții pentru piept pentru hochei; Bretele și curele pentru hochei; Curele și accesorii pentru apărători de tibie
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Patinage artistique et hockey > Équipement de protection de hockey: Pantalons de compression de hockey; Protège-coudes de hockey; Gaines de hockey; Gants de hockey; Équipement de gardien; Casques de hockey; Coquilles et protections pelviennes de hockey; Protège-cous de hockey; Pantalons de hockey; Protège-tibias et jambières de hockey; Épaulières et plastrons de hockey; Ceintures et bretelles pour hockey; Sangles et accessoires de protège-tibias
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Фигурно пързаляне и хокей > Защитна екипировка за хокей: Компресиращи панталони за хокей; Налакътници за хокей; Защитни панталони за хокей; Ръкавици за хокей; Комплекти екипировка за хокейни вратари; Каски за хокей; Панталони с протектори и протектори за таз; Протектори за врат за хокей; Панталони за хокей; Предпазители за пищяла и подплънки за крака за хокей; Подплънки за рамене и предпазители за гръдния кош за хокей; Тиранти и колани за хокей; Аксесоари за протектори за слабини
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Kunstskøjteløb og ishockey > Hockey-beskyttelsesudstyr: Kompressionsbukser til hockey; Albuebeskyttere til ishockey; Hockey-girdles; Hockeyhandsker; Målmandsudstyr til ishockey; Hockeyhjelme; Skridt- og bækkenbeskyttere til hockey; Halsbeskyttere til hockey; Hockeybukser; Benskinner og benbeskyttere til ishockey; Skulder- og brystbeskyttelse til ishockey; Hockeyseler og -bælter; Stropper og tilbehør til benskinner
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Patinaje artístico y hockey > Equipo de protección de hockey: Pantalones de compresión de hockey; Coderas para hockey; Fajas de hockey; Guantes de hockey; Conjuntos de equipamiento para porteros de hockey; Cascos de hockey; Coquillas y protectores pélvicos de hockey; Protectores de cuello de hockey; Pantalones de hockey; Almohadillas para piernas y protectores de barbilla para hockey; Hombreras y protectores de pecho para hockey; Cinturones y tirantes para hockey; Correas y accesorios para espinilleras
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Umjetničko klizanje i hokej > Zaštitna oprema za hokej: Kompresivne hlače za hokej; Hokejaški štitnici za laktove; Pojasevi za hokej; Hokejaške rukavice; Kompleti opreme za hokejaške vratare; Hokejaške kacige; Štitnici za međunožje za hokej; Štitnici za vrat za hokej; Hokejaške hlače; Hokejaški štitnici za potkoljenice i noge; Hokejaški štitnici za ramena i prsa; Hokejaški tregeri i pojasevi; Remeni i dodaci za štitnike za potkoljenice
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Artistik Paten ve Hokey > Hokey Koruyucu Ekipmanları: Hokey kompresyon pantolonları; Hokey Dirsek Pedleri; Hokey koruyucu taytları; Hokey Eldivenleri; Hokey Kaleci Malzeme Setleri; Hokey Kaskları; Hokey kasık ve pelvik koruyucuları; Hokey boyun korumaları; Hokey Pantolonu; Hokey Tekmelikleri ve Bacak Pedleri; Hokey Omuz Pedleri ve Göğüs Koruyucuları; Hokey Askıları ve Kemerleri; Tekmelik kayışları ve aksesuarları
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 花式滑冰/冰上曲棍球 > 曲棍球護具: 曲棍球壓縮褲; 曲棍球護肘; 曲棍球防護束褲; 曲棍球手套; 曲棍球守門員裝備組; 曲棍球安全帽; 曲棍球護襠與骨盆護具; 曲棍球護頸; 曲棍球褲; 曲棍球護脛/護腿板; 曲棍球護肩/護胸; 曲棍球吊帶/腰帶; 護脛綁帶與配件
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Figure Skating & Hockey > Hockey Protective Gear: Hockey Compression Pants; Hockey Elbow Pads; Hockey Girdles; Hockey Gloves; Hockey Goalie Equipment Sets; Hockey Helmets; Hockey Jocks & Pelvic Protectors; Hockey Neck Guards; Hockey Pants; Hockey Shin Guards & Leg Pads; Hockey Shoulder Pads & Chest Protectors; Hockey Suspenders & Belts; Shin Guard Straps & Accessories
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > フィギュアスケート・アイスホッケー用品 > アイスホッケー用プロテクター: ホッケー用コンプレッションパンツ; アイスホッケー用エルボーパッド; ホッケー用ガードル; アイスホッケー用グローブ; ゴールテンダー用防具セット; アイスホッケー用ヘルメット; ホッケー用ジョック・骨盤プロテクター; ホッケー用ネックガード; アイスホッケー用パンツ; アイスホッケー用レガース・レッグパッド; アイスホッケー用ショルダーパッド・プロテクター; ホッケー用サスペンダー/ベルト; シンガードストラップ＆アクセサリー
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Krasokorčuľovanie a hokej > Hokejové ochranné pomôcky: Hokejové kompresné nohavice; Hokejové chrániče lakťov; Hokejové podväzky; Hokejové rukavice; Súpravy vybavenia pre hokejových brankárov; Hokejové prilby; Hokejové suspenzory a chrániče panvy; Chrániče krku na hokej; Hokejové nohavice; Hokejové chrániče holene a chrániče nôh; Hokejové chrániče ramien a hrudníka; Hokejové suspenzory a opasky; Popruhy a príslušenstvo na chrániče holení
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Kunstrijden en ijshockey > Beschermende uitrusting voor ijshockey: Compressiebroeken voor hockey; Elleboogbeschermers voor ijshockey; Girdles voor hockey; Hockeyhandschoenen; Uitrustingssets voor ijshockeykeepers; Hockeyhelmen; Kruis- en bekkenbeschermers voor hockey; Nekbeschermers voor hockey; IJshockeybroeken; Scheen- en beenbeschermers voor ijshockey; Schouder- en borstbeschermers voor ijshockey; Jarretelles en jarretelgordels voor ijshockey; Banden en accessoires voor scheenbeschermers
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Καλλιτεχνικό πατινάζ & χόκεϊ > Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός χόκεϊ: Παντελόνια συμπίεσης χόκεϊ; Μαξιλαράκια αγκώνων χόκεϊ; Προστατευτικά σορτς χόκεϊ; Γάντια χόκεϊ; Σετ εξοπλισμού τερματοφύλακα χόκεϊ; Κράνη χόκεϊ; Σπασουάρ και προστατευτικά πυέλου χόκεϊ; Προστατευτικά λαιμού χόκεϊ; Παντελόνια χόκεϊ; Επιγονατίδες & προστατευτικά ποδιών χόκεϊ; Προστατευτικά ώμων & θώρακα χόκεϊ; Τιράντες & ζώνες χόκεϊ; Ιμάντες & αξεσουάρ επικαλαμίδων
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Umetnostno drsanje in hokej > Zaščitna oprema za hokej: Hokejske kompresijske hlače; Hokejski ščitniki za komolce; Hokejski pasovi; Hokejske rokavice; Kompleti opreme za hokejske vratarje; Hokejske čelade; Ščitniki za dimlje in medenico za hokej; Ščitniki za vrat za hokej; Hokejske hlače; Hokejski ščitniki za goleni in ščitniki za noge; Hokejski ščitniki za ramena in ščitniki za prsni koš; Hokejske naramnice in pasovi; Trakovi in dodatki za ščitnike za goleni
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Konståkning och hockey > Skyddsutrustning för hockey: Kompressionsbyxor för ishockey; Armbågsskydd för hockey; Gördlar för ishockey; Hockeyhandskar; Utrustning för hockeymålvakter; Hockeyhjälmar; Suspensoarer och bäckenskydd för ishockey; Halsskydd för ishockey; Hockeybyxor; Smalbens- och benskydd för hockey; Axel- och bröstskydd för hockey; Hockeyhängslen och -bälten; Benskyddsremmar och tillbehör
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > สเกตลีลาและฮอกกี้ > อุปกรณ์ป้องกันของฮอกกี้: กางเกงรัดกล้ามเนื้อฮอกกี้; ที่ป้องกันข้อศอกของฮอกกี้; กางเกงกันกระแทกฮอกกี้; ถุงมือฮอกกี้; ชุดอุปกรณ์ผู้รักษาประตูฮอกกี้; หมวกกันน็อคสำหรับฮอกกี้; กระจับและที่ป้องกันกระดูกเชิงกรานฮอกกี้; ที่ป้องกันคอฮอกกี้; กางเกงฮ็อกกี้; ที่ป้องกันขาและคางของฮอกกี้; ที่ป้องกันหน้าอกและไหล่ของฮอกกี้; เข็มขัดและสายเอี๊ยมฮอกกี้; สายรัดและอุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับสนับแข้ง
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Eiskunstlauf & Hockey > Hockey-Schutzausrüstung: Hockey-Kompressionshosen; Hockey-Ellenbogenschutz; Hockey-Girdles; Hockeyhandschuhe; Ausrüstungssets für Torwarte; Hockeyhelme; Tief- & Beckenschützer für Hockey; Hockey-Halsschützer; Hockeyhosen; Hockey-Schienbeinschoner & -Beinschutz; Hockey-Schulterpolster & -Brustpolster; Eishockeyhosenträger und -gürtel; Riemen & Zubehör für Schienbeinschoner
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Хоккей и фигурное катание > Защитная экипировка для хоккея: Хоккейные компрессионные штаны; Хоккейные налокотники; Хоккейные гирдлы; Хоккейные перчатки; Комплекты экипировки для хоккейных вратарей; Хоккейные шлемы; Хоккейная защита паха и бандажи; Защита шеи для хоккея; Хоккейные трусы; Хоккейные щитки; Хоккейные нагрудники; Хоккейные подтяжки и пояса; Ремни и аксессуары для щитков на голень
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Taitoluistelu ja jääkiekko > Jääkiekkosuojat: Jääkiekon kompressiohousut; Kyynärpääsuojat jääkiekkoon; Jääkiekon suojahousut; Jääkiekkohanskat; Jääkiekkomaalivahdin varusteet; Jääkiekkokypärät; Jääkiekon alasuojat; Jääkiekon kaulasuojat; Jääkiekkohousut; Jääkiekon säärisuojat ja patjat; Jääkiekon hartiasuojat; Jääkiekkohenkselit ja sukanpidikkeet; Säärisuojien hihnat ja lisävarusteet
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Krasobruslení a hokej > Hokejové chrániče: Hokejové kompresní kalhoty; Hokejové chrániče loktů; Vnitřní hokejové kalhoty; Hokejové rukavice; Sady vybavení pro hokejové brankáře; Hokejové přilby; Hokejové suspenzory a chrániče pánve; Hokejové nákrčníky; Hokejové kalhoty; Hokejové chrániče holení a nohou; Hokejové chrániče ramen a hrudi; Hokejové šle a pásky; Pásky a příslušenství k chráničům holení
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Kunstløp og hockey > Beskyttelsesutstyr for hockey: Kompresjonsbukser for hockey; Albuebeskyttere for hockey; Beskyttelsesshorts for hockey; Hockeyhansker; Utstyrssett for hockeykeepere; Hockeyhjelmer; Suspensorier og bekkenbeskyttere for hockey; Halsbeskyttere for hockey; Hockeybukser; Legg- og benbeskyttere for hockey; Skulderputer og brystbeskyttere for hockey; Hockeyseler og -belter; Reimer og tilbehør til leggbeskyttere
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Pattinaggio di figura e hockey > Attrezzatura protettiva hockey: Pantaloni a compressione da hockey; Gomitiere da hockey; Girdle protettivi da hockey; Guanti da hockey; Set di attrezzatura per portieri di hockey; Caschi da hockey; Sospensori e protezioni pelviche da hockey; Paracollo da hockey; Pantaloncini da hockey; Ginocchiere e parastinchi da hockey; Protezioni per petto e spalle da hockey; Cinture e reggicalze per hockey; Cinturini e accessori per parastinchi
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Łyżwiarstwo figurowe i hokej > Ochraniacze hokejowe: Spodnie kompresyjne do hokeja; Hokejowe ochraniacze łokci; Pasy ochronne do hokeja; Rękawice hokejowe; Zestawy ochronne dla bramkarzy hokejowych; Kaski hokejowe; Suspensoria i ochraniacze miednicy do hokeja; Ochraniacze szyi do hokeja; Spodnie hokejowe; Hokejowe ochraniacze na nogi i golenie; Hokejowe naramienniki i ochraniacze tułowia; Szelki i pasy hokejowe; Paski i akcesoria do nagolenników